apertium-sl-es.sl.dix
    <pardef n="pot__n_f">
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>jo</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ema</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>eh</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>mi</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>									

    <pardef n="slug/a__n">
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oma</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ama</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ah</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ama</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>oma</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ov</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>om</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>am</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ah</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
	</pardef>

    <pardef n="mošk/i__n">
      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>       <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>emu</l>       <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ega</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ima</l>       <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="du"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>im</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ih</l>        <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>imi</l>       <r>i<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
	</pardef>

	<e lm="dežurni">         <i>dežurn</i><par n="mošk/i__n"/></e>
	<e lm="moški">           <i>mošk</i><par n="mošk/i__n"/></e>
